Rhode Island statutes. Title 8 Courts and Civil Procedure — Courts
Chapter 10 Family Court
8-10-38.
Judgments, decrees, and orders — Punishment for contempt.

Like powers are hereby conferred upon the family court as are conferred upon the superior court by the provisions of §

8-6-1

.

Provided, however, a justice of the family court shall notify the principal of a school that the court is ordering the placement of a juvenile in the principal’s school. The principal of the school shall have a right to be heard prior to the placement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 358, § 2.

8-10-38.1.
Imprisonment for contempt.

The justices of the family court or its magistrate(s) are hereby empowered, when ordering a noncomplying parent to the adult correctional institution or the women’s reformatory for contempt, to order immediate work release status for him or her.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 406, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 442, § 2.

8-10-39.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L., §

8-10-39

, as enacted by P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 5.

8-10-40, 8-10-41.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1990, ch. 203, § 2, effective July 9, 1990. For present similar provisions see chapter 14 of this title.

8-10-42.
Engagement — Precedence — Retirement and powers of justices.

Those provisions of chapter 3 of this title, which relate to superior court justices, shall apply to the chief judge and associate justices of the family court and, for purposes of eligibility for retirement under §

8-3-7

as amended by chapter 2 of the public laws, 1959, service as a chief judge or associate judge of the juvenile court prior to September 1, 1961 shall be included as if the service had been on the family court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 3.

8-10-42.1.
Service after retirement.

Any justice of the family court who shall resign in accordance with the provisions of §

8-3-9

may, at his or her own consent and on request of the chief judge of the court, be assigned to perform service as an associate justice thereof. When so assigned and performing such service, he or she shall have all the powers and authority of an associate justice of the family court, but otherwise he or she shall have no such powers nor be authorized to perform any judicial duties. Such a retired justice shall not be counted in the number of judges provided by law for the family court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 162, § 2.

8-10-43.
References to family court — Powers and duties.

Wherever in any general or public law the words “juvenile court,” “judge of juvenile court,” or “chief judge of the juvenile court” shall appear, the terms shall mean and include “family court,” “justice of family court,” or “chief judge of the family court.” Wherever in any general or public law the words “domestic relations court,” “court of domestic relations,” or “judge of domestic relations court” shall appear, the terms shall mean and include “family court” or “chief judge or any associate justice of family court.” Wherever in title 15 reference is made to the superior court or the court of domestic relations, that reference shall mean and include the family court. In addition to the powers and authority specifically granted in this chapter, the justices of the family court shall have, insofar as they are applicable, the same obligations and duties as superior court justices, and in all matters within the jurisdiction of the court shall be vested with all of the prerogatives and authority of associate justices of the superior court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14.

8-10-43.1.
Venue of criminal offenses.

The chief judge of the family court or his or her designee shall fix the venue for trial of any person accused of any criminal offense which is subject to the jurisdiction of the family court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 345, § 1.

8-10-44.
Annual appropriations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sums as shall be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her order on the general treasurer for the payment of such sum, or so much thereof as may be required from time to time, upon receipt by him or her of duly authenticated vouchers approved by the chief judge of the family court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 15.

8-10-45.
Severability.

The provisions of this chapter are severable, and if any of its provisions shall be held unconstitutional by any court of competent jurisdiction, the decision of that court shall not affect or impair any of the remaining provisions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 19.